Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 14.2 Small Loan Lenders

19-14.2-1.
Maximum rate on small loans not authorized by chapter.

No person, except as authorized by this chapter, shall directly or indirectly charge, contract for, or receive any interest, discount, or consideration greater than provided by this chapter upon the loan, use, or sale of credit of the amount or value of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less.

The prohibition in subsection (a) shall apply to any person who, by any device, subterfuge, or pretense shall charge, contract for, or receive greater interest, consideration, or charges than is authorized by this chapter for the loan, use, or forbearance of money, goods, or things in action, or for the loan, use, or sale of credit.

No loan of the amount or value of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less for which a greater rate of interest, consideration, or charges than is permitted by this chapter has been charged, contracted for, or received, wherever made, shall be enforced in this state, and every person in any way participating therein in this state shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter, provided that this section shall not apply to loans legally made in any other state, commonwealth, or district which then has in effect a regulatory small loan law similar in principal to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 54.

19-14.2-2.
Confessions of judgment — Incomplete instruments prohibited.

No small loan lender shall take any confession of judgment, or any power of attorney, except a power of attorney or power of sale authorizing the small loan lender in case of default in payment of interest or principal, to enforce the provisions of any chattel mortgage or pledge. No small loan lender shall take any note, promise to pay, or security that does not accurately disclose the actual amount of the loan, the time for which it is made, and the agreed rate of interest nor any instrument in which blanks are left to be filled in after execution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 54.

19-14.2-3.
Unemployment insurance defined.

For the purposes of this chapter, involuntary unemployment insurance coverage shall not be a factor in the approval by the small loan lender of any loan. The small loan lender shall give and maintain specific written indication that the cost of this coverage is disclosed to the debtor; that the coverage is not a condition for the extension of credit; and that the debtor voluntarily desires the coverage. The debtor shall be given written notice of his or her right to cancel within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the insurance policy and that the cancellation will result in a full refund of any premiums paid. Unemployment resulting from a labor dispute shall be deemed involuntary unemployment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 54.

19-14.2-4.
Documents delivered to borrower — Advance payments — Release of security.

Every small loan lender who is the holder of any note shall:

Give to the borrower or the borrower’s agent making payment a plain and complete receipt for all payments on the loan at the time the payment is made, in person, at the small loan lender’s office;

Permit payment to be made in advance in any amount on any contract of loan at any time, but the small loan lender may apply the payment first to all interest in full at the agreed rate and other permitted charges, up to the date of the payment; and

Upon repayment of the loan in full, mark indelibly every obligation and security signed by the borrower with the word “paid” or “canceled” and restore any pledge; cancel and return any note or a copy of the note; and cancel and return any assignment, or a copy of the assignment, given to the small loan lender by the borrower.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 54.

19-14.2-5.
Instrument evidencing loan, contents.

No loan document shall contain:

Any acceleration clause under which any part or all of the unpaid balance of the obligation not yet matured may be declared due and payable because the holder deems himself or herself to be insecure;

Any power of attorney to confess judgment or any other power of attorney;

Any provision whereby the debtor waives any rights accruing to him or her under the provisions of this title or any other law expressly prohibiting this waiver;

Any requirement that more than one installment be payable in any one installment period; or

Any assignment of or order for the payment of any salary, wages, commission, or other compensation for services, or any part of these, earned or to be earned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 54.

19-14.2-6.
Assignment of earnings.

The payment in money, credit, goods, or things in action, as consideration for any sale or assignment of, or order for, the payment of wages, salary, commissions, or other compensation for services, whether earned or to be earned, shall, for the purposes of regulation under this chapter, be deemed a loan secured by the assignment, and the amount that the assigned compensation exceeds the amount of consideration actually paid shall, for the purposes of regulation under this chapter, be deemed interest upon the loan from the date of the payment to the date the compensation is payable. The transaction shall be governed by, and subject to, the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 54.

19-14.2-7.
Assignment of wages simultaneous with loan — Liens on furniture.

No assignment of, or order for, payment of any salary, wages, commissions, or other compensation for services, earned or to be earned, given to secure any loan made by any small loan lender under this chapter, shall be valid unless the amount of the loan is paid to the borrower simultaneously with its execution; nor shall the assignment or order, or any chattel mortgage or other lien on household furniture then in the possession and use of the borrower, be valid unless it is in writing, signed in person by the borrower, nor if the borrower is married unless it is signed in person by both husband and wife, provided that written assent of a spouse shall not be required when husband and wife have been living separate and apart for a period of at least five (5) months prior to the making of the assignment, order, mortgage, or lien.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 54.

19-14.2-8.
Maximum loan and interest rate.

Every small loan lender may lend up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) in the aggregate to one borrower and may charge, contract for, and receive on the loan interest on the unpaid principal balance on a loan at a rate not exceeding the following:

Loans up to and including three hundred dollars ($300), three percent (3%) per month;

Loans exceeding three hundred dollars ($300) but not exceeding eight hundred dollars ($800), two and one-half percent (2.5%) per month; and

Loans exceeding eight hundred dollars ($800), but not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), two percent (2%) per month.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 54.

19-14.2-9.
Split loans.

No small loan lender shall induce or permit any borrower to split up or divide any loan, or permit any person to become obligated individually under more than one loan contract at the same time, for the purpose or with the result of obtaining a higher rate of charge than would otherwise be permitted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 54.

19-14.2-10.
Computation of interest.

Interest on loans made under this chapter shall not be paid, deducted, or received in advance, or compounded, and shall be computed and paid only on unpaid principal balances and on the basis of the number of days actually elapsed. For the purpose of these computations, a month shall be any period of thirty (30) consecutive days.

If part or all of the consideration for a contract of a small loan is the unpaid balance of a prior loan with the same licensee, then the principal of the new contract of loan shall not include any unpaid interest on the prior loan, except interest that has accrued within sixty (60) days before the making of the new contract of loan; provided, however, that unpaid interest on a prior loan may not be so included in the principal of a new loan more than once in any period of twelve (12) months.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 54.

19-14.2-11.
Maximum term of small loans.

No small loan lender shall enter into any contract of loan under this chapter of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less, excluding charges, under which the borrower agrees to make any scheduled repayment of cash advance or principal more than twenty-five (25) months from the date of making the contract, nor, any contract of small loan exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), but not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), excluding charges, under which the borrower agrees to make any scheduled repayment of cash advance or principal more than sixty (60) months from the date of making the contract. Every contract of small loan shall provide for repayment of the loan in substantially equal installments at approximately equal periodical intervals of time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 54.

19-14.2-12.
Small loans — No other charges — Exception.

In addition to the interest allowed in this chapter, no small loan licensee shall directly, or indirectly, charge, contract for, or receive any other charges except credit insurance, lawful filing fees and insurance charges, and other fees listed in §

6-26-2(c)

or as authorized by regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 54.

19-14.2-13.
Additional documents delivered to borrower.

Every licensee who is the holder of any small loan note shall deliver to the borrower, at the time any small loan is made, a statement of the law regarding interest rate and term limitations, in plain English, showing in clear and distinct terms the amount and date of the loan and of its maturity; the nature of the security, if any, for the loan; the name and address of the borrower and of the licensee; and the agreed rate of interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 54.

19-14.2-14.
Penalties.

Any person or any member, officer, director, agent, or employee of any person, who knowingly violates or participates in the violation of any of the applicable provisions of this chapter, or any regulation promulgated under this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense. Complaints under this chapter may be made by the director, or the director’s designee, and he or she shall not be required to give surety for costs. The attorney general shall prosecute all complaints under this chapter.

Any contract of loan not invalid for any other reason, in the making or collecting of which any act has been done that constitutes a misdemeanor under this section, shall be voidable, at the discretion of the court, and the small loan lender shall have no right to collect or receive any principal, interest, fees, or charges.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 54.

19-14.2-15.
Rules and regulations.

The director, or the director’s designee, may, adopt reasonable rules and regulations for the implementation and administration of the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 54.

19-14.2-16.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 54.